Hawaii statutes.
§171-74 Qualifications of lessees. To
qualify for a residential lease under this part, the lessee shall:

(1) Be of legal age and have at least one person,
related to the lessee by blood or marriage and solely dependent upon the lessee
for support, who will occupy the premises with the lessee; provided that this
requirement shall not apply to a husband and wife or to reciprocal
beneficiaries who are joint lessees, even if both are employed;

(2) Be a citizen and a resident of the State for not
less than five years immediately preceding the issuance of the lease;

(3) Have a gross income not in excess of $20,000 a
year, including the gross income of the lessee's spouse or reciprocal
beneficiary. In determining gross income, the standard income tax exemption
for each of the lessee's dependents, as determined by the income tax laws of
the State, shall be allowed; and

(4) Have such other qualifications as may be
established by the board of land and natural resources.

Any person who, after taking a residential
lease, through change or circumstances, loses the qualifications initially
required of the person or becomes disqualified to take a residential lease,
shall not thereby be required to surrender the person's residential lease, but
shall be entitled to continue to hold the same. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; Supp,
§103A-70; HRS §171-74; am L 1970, c 184, §5; gen ch 1985; am L 1997, c 383,
§35]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next